Wisconsin, session 2025, SB451.
do enact as follows:SB451,11Section 1. 67.05 (6a) (a) 2. (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB451,2,12267.05 (6a) (a) 2. (intro.) Except as provided under pars. (b) and (c) and subs. 3(7) and (15), and subject to subd. 3. and the limit on the number of referendums that 4may be called in any calendar year under subd. 2. a., if the board of any school 5district, or the electors at a regularly called school district meeting, by a majority 6vote adopt an initial resolution to raise an amount of money by a bond issue, the 7school district clerk shall, within 10 days, publish notice of such adoption as a class 81 notice under ch. 985 or post the notice as provided under s. 10.05. The notice shall 9state the maximum amount proposed to be borrowed, the purpose of the borrowing, 10that the resolution was adopted under this subdivision and the place where and the 11hours during which the resolution may be inspected. The school board shall also do 12one of the following:SB451,213Section 2. 67.05 (6a) (a) 3. of the statutes is created to read:SB451,3,71467.05 (6a) (a) 3. Beginning on the effective date of this subdivision .... [LRB 15inserts date], a school board may not adopt a initial resolution to raise an amount of 16money by a bond issue and a vote of the electors of a school district may not be held 17to adopt a initial resolution to raise an amount of money by a bond issue unless the 18department of public instruction certifies that, as of a date that is no earlier than 14 19days before the date on which the school board or the electors adopt the resolution, 1the school board of the school district is in compliance with all applicable 2requirements to submit financial information to the department of public 3instruction or the state superintendent of public instruction, including 4requirements to submit financial information under ss. 119.44 (1), 120.08, 120.14, 5and 121.05. If a school board or the electors of a school district adopt a resolution 6under subd. 2. in violation of this subdivision, the resolution and any referendum 7that submits the resolution to the electors of the school district is void.SB451,38Section 3. 121.91 (3) (a) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB451,4,29121.91 (3) (a) 1. If Subject to subd. 3., if a school board wishes to exceed the 10limit under sub. (2m) otherwise applicable to the school district in any school year, 11it shall promptly adopt a resolution supporting inclusion in the final school district 12budget of an amount equal to the proposed excess revenue. The resolution shall 13specify whether the proposed excess revenue is for a recurring or nonrecurring 14purpose, or, if the proposed excess revenue is for both recurring and nonrecurring 15purposes, the amount of the proposed excess revenue for each purpose. The 16resolution shall be filed as provided in s. 8.37. Within 10 days after adopting the 17resolution, the school board shall notify the department that it will schedule a 18referendum for the purpose of submitting the resolution to the electors of the school 19district for approval or rejection and shall submit a copy of the resolution to the 20department. Except as provided in subd. 2., the school board shall schedule the 21referendum to be held at the next regularly scheduled spring primary or election or 22partisan primary or general election, provided such election is to be held not sooner 23than 70 days after the filing of the resolution of the school board. A school board 24may proceed under this subdivision and under s. 67.05 (6a) (a) 2. a. no more than 2 1times in any calendar year. The school district clerk shall certify the results of the 2referendum to the department within 10 days after the referendum is held.SB451,43Section 4. 121.91 (3) (a) 3. of the statutes is created to read:SB451,4,124121.91 (3) (a) 3. Beginning on the effective date of this subdivision .... [LRB 5inserts date], a school board may not adopt a resolution under subd. 1. unless the 6department certifies that, as of a date that is no earlier than 14 days before the date 7on which the school board votes to adopt the resolution, the school board is in 8compliance with all applicable requirements to submit financial information to the 9department or the state superintendent, including requirements to submit 10financial information under ss. 119.44 (1), 120.08, 120.14, and 121.05. If a school 11board adopts a resolution under subd. 1. in violation of this subdivision, the 12resolution and any referendum that submits the resolution to the electors is void.SB451,4,1313